Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6168.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 14a. (1) When issuing a dog license under section 14, a county treasurer, city clerk, city treasurer, township treasurer, or the authorized agent of a city or township treasurer, including, but not limited to, a veterinarian, animal control shelter, or animal protection shelter, shall also provide information to the dog owner regarding the availability of microchip implantation and registration for dogs by a veterinarian, animal control shelter, or animal protection shelter. (2) As used in this section, "animal control shelter" and "animal protection shelter" mean those terms as defined in section 1 of 1969 PA 287, MCL 287.331, and are facilities registered licensed with the department of agriculture and rural development under section 6 4 of 1969 PA 287, MCL 287.336.287.334. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02817'25) or House Bill No. 6167 (request no. H02817'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.